Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 9. Band Concerts

§ 15-1-901.
Concerts and payment authorized; membership.

Any city or town may provide public band concerts for the entertainment of their residents and pay the expense out of any monies in the general fund. The band concerts shall be given at a place designated by the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 106; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-106; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-1001

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 58, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to public parks, recreational areas, etc., generally, see §§

15-7-301

to

15-7-305

.

The 2007 amendment,

deleted the last sentence, which read: “No band may be employed to give concerts other than a regularly organized band whose members are residents of the city or town where the concert is given.”

Laws 2007, ch. 58, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 16, 2007.

§ 15-1-902.
Tax levy.

Any city or town when authorized may levy each year for band concerts, a tax not exceeding one (1) mill on the dollar of all taxable property within its boundaries. The revenue obtained therefrom shall be used only for band concerts.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 107, 111; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-107, 15.1-111; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-1002

,

15-1-1006

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 15-1-903.
Tax levy; petition for election thereon; form of question; vote required; limitation.

If a petition signed by fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors who are real property holders within the city or town is filed with the clerk requesting that the question of a levy for band purposes be submitted to the election of the city or town, the governing body shall submit the question to the voters at the next general municipal election as follows: “Shall a tax not exceeding . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . mill be levied each year on all taxable property within the boundaries of the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . for the purpose of providing a fund for the maintenance or employment of a municipal band for musical purposes?”

If a majority of votes cast favor the proposition, the governing body shall in each subsequent year levy the tax as approved by the electors in the petition but not exceeding one (1) mill on the dollar on all taxable property within the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 108, 109; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-108, 15.1-109; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-1003

,

15-1-1004

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-904.
Tax levy; petition for election on discontinuing; form of question; vote required.

If a petition signed by fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors who are real property holders within the city or town is filed with the clerk requesting that the question of discontinuing the levy for band concerts be submitted to the voters, the governing body shall submit the question at the next general municipal election as follows: “Shall the levy of a tax for the purpose of providing a fund for the maintenance or employment of a municipal band for municipal purposes be discontinued?”

If a majority of the votes are in the affirmative, the levy shall be discontinued.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 110; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-110; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-1005

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.